Massachusetts, session 194th, H2246.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. This bill shall hold property owners that face multiple public nuisance
complaints accountable. After 10 police calls regarding complaints from or involving a specific
location over a period of 1 year, the property owner shall be responsible for the cost associated
with any additional police calls and other costs incurred by the police department and/or
municipality.
Section 2. Any funds collected from property owners based on this legislation shall go
back towards the municipality.
Section 3. Enforcement of this legislation is at the discretion of the Chief of Police or
other local authority of the city or town where the property is located.
of 1